Illinois, session 104th, HB4525.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The amount of $430,000, or so much of that 5amount as may be necessary, is appropriated from the General 6Revenue Fund to the State Board of Education to distribute to 7the Lake County Tech Campus for operational expenses. 8    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect July 1, 92026.